South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3794.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-31-240 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 23-31-240. (A) Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this article, the following persons who possess a valid permit pursuant to this article may carry a concealable weapon anywhere within this State: (1) active Supreme Court justices; (2) active judges of the court of appeals; (3) active circuit court judges; (4) active family court judges; (5) active masters-in-equity; (6) active probate court judges; (7) active magistrates; (8) active municipal court judges; (9) active federal judges; (10) active administrative law judges; (11) active solicitors and assistant solicitors; (12) active workers' compensation commissioners; (13) the Attorney General and assistant attorneys general; (14) active county clerks of court; and (15) active public defenders and assistant public defenders; and (16) employed full-time active public defender investigators and assistant public defender investigators. (B) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (A), public defenders and assistant public defenders, and public defender investigators and assistant public defender investigators may not carry a concealable weapon into a local or state correctional facility. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----